test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-perinto_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - perintö - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'arv' - ei tsekattu
     perintö+N+Sg+Nom: perintö
     perintö+N+Sg+Gen: perinnön
     perintö+N+Sg+Par: perinttöö
     perintö+N+Sg+Tra: perinnöksi
     perintö+N+Sg+Abe: perinnöttä
     perintö+N+Sg+Ine: perinnössä
     perintö+N+Sg+Ela: perinnöstä
     perintö+N+Sg+Ill: perinthöön
     perintö+N+Sg+Ade: perinnöllä
     perintö+N+Sg+Abl: perinnöltä
     perintö+N+Sg+All: perinnölle
     perintö+N+Sg+Ess: perintönä
     perintö+N+Pl+Nom: perinnöt
     perintö+N+Pl+Gen: perinnöitten
     perintö+N+Pl+Par: perinnöittä
     perintö+N+Pl+Tra: perinnöiksi
     perintö+N+Pl+Abe: perinnöitä
     perintö+N+Pl+Ine: perinnöissä
     perintö+N+Pl+Ela: perinnöistä
     perintö+N+Pl+Ill: perinthöihiin
     perintö+N+Pl+Ade: perinnöillä
     perintö+N+Pl+Abl: perinnöiltä
     perintö+N+Pl+All: perinnöille
     perintö+N+Pl+Ess: perintöinä
     perintö+N+Pl+Com: perintöine
